Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-3508.01
Geologic specialty, defined.

Geologic specialty means a branch of geology which has been recognized for the purposes of licensure, including, but not limited to, environmental geology, engineering geology, geophysics, hydrogeology, petroleum geology, mining geology, and structural geology.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 59;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 81-3511;

Laws 2025, LB38, § 7.